New Jersey, session 221, A2073.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. There shall be annually appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection from the General Fund the sum of $3,000,000 for the State Mosquito Control Commission to provide funding to local governments for mosquito control, research, administration, and operations. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.